Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.34
Sampling, defined.

Sampling means consumption
on the premises of a retail licensee of not more than five samples of one
fluid ounce or less of alcoholic liquor by the same person in a twenty-four-hour
period.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 42.